src/fst/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
! Tsuut'ina nouns can appear in inflected forms that reflect two features:
! possession (person and number of possessor, with some entanglement with
! the person and number of the subject of the utterance in cases where the
! possessed noun isn't itself the subject) and number (singular vs. plural,
! only in the case of a closed set of nouns):
!
! 1. Possession: Tsuut'ina nouns can be divided into three classes on the
! basis of possession:
!
!   1. Nouns that always appear in unpossessed form (e.g., nàk'us "cloud").
!      This class includes both common and proper nouns.
!
!   2. Nouns that always appear in possessed form (e.g., sitsì "my head", nitò
!      "your father").  This class is generally limited to body parts and
!      kinship terms.
!
!   3. Nouns that may appear in either possessed or unpossessed form (e.g.,
!      más "knife" ~ simázà "my knife", guuniizh "story" ~ máa guunijà
!      "his/her/its story").
!
! Nouns in the third class typically have different possessed and unpossessed
! stem forms (e.g., más [unpossessed] vs. -mázà [possessed] "knife", násʔághá
! [unpossessed] vs. -násʔághà [possessed] "house").
!
! Nouns that have possessed forms may indicate possession morphosyntactically
! in two different ways:
!
!   A. With the addition of a possessive prefix (e.g., si- "1SG.POSS"). There
!      are three phonologically distinct sets of these prefixes:
!
!       i.   Mid-tone possessive prefixes: Possessive prefixes appear with a
!            short, mid-tone vowel of the form si-, ni-, mi- (e.g., sinásʔághà
!            "my house").  These are the most common possessive prefix forms
!            in Tsuut'ina.
!
!       ii.  High-tone possessive prefixes: Possessive prefixes appear with a
!            short, high-tone vowel of the form sí-, ní-, mí- (e.g., sítsí
!            "my nose", sídá "my older sister).  This high tone derives
!            historically from a nasalized vowel in this prefix, and only
!            appear in a small, closed set of lexemes in present-day Tsuut'ina.
!
!       iii. Mid-rising-tone possessive prefixes: Possessive prefixes appear
!            with a long, mid-to-high rising tone vowel of the form sií-,
!            nií-, mií- (e.g., siízá "my son [woman speaking]", siíts'a "my
!            daughter [woman speaking]").  These appear only a very limited,
!            closed set of lexemes.
!
!   B. With an inflected postposition of the form sáa, náa, máa, that appears
!      immediately before the possessed noun (e.g., sáa guunijà "my story"
!      [alongside siguunijà], sáa 'uncle' "my uncle").  This strategy for
!      indicating possession is often used with loanwords from languages like
!      English, and the inflected postposition is sometimes written as a prefix
!      on the possessed noun (i.e., without any whitespace separating the
!      postposition from the possessed noun)
!
! While most possessed nouns occur only appear in one of these possessive
! constructions, a small number are attested in both (e.g., máa guunijà ~
! miguunijà "his/her/its story").
!
!
! 2. Number: Most nouns in Tsuut'ina are not inflected for number (singular
! vs. plural), and do not provide any morphological indications of a number
! distinction.  That is, the same noun form can have both singular and plural
! interpretations, based on the context in which it appears (e.g., diná
! "person, people"; tłìk'í más"one knife" vs. akíyí más "two knives").
!
! A small, closed set of Tsuut'ina nouns have distinct singular and plural
! forms.  These can be divided into two classes:
!
!   1. Nouns that may appear with the suffix -ká to indicate plural number
!      (e.g., tłích'á "dog" ~ tłích'áká "dogs", xaní "cow" ~ xaníká/xanáká
!      "cows").
!
!      This set is limited to a small number of nouns referring to living
!      beings, generally domesticated and semi-domesticated animals (e.g.,
!      most livestock, dogs, cats) and, for some speakers, some kinship
!      terms (e.g., grandchildren, younger sisters and brothers, etc.).
!      This plural suffix appears with both possessed and unpossessed forms
!      of these nouns (e.g., ístłíká "horses" ~ silích'àká "my horses").
!
!      It should be noted that
!
!       i.  A number of these nouns whose singular forms contain /i/ come to
!           have assimilated pronunciations with /a/ when -ká is added.  This
!           results in irregular-seeming plural forms (e.g., ístłí "horse" ~
!           ástłáká "horses", alongside ístłíká).
!
!       ii. Some Tsuut'ina speakers report that -ká may only be used with
!           animals and not with kinship terms (cf. TLL-20230619), while
!           others accept -ká with both.
!
!   2. Nouns that have suppletive plural forms (e.g., ts'ìdoótsa "girl" ~
!      it'óókúwá "girls", k'àt'íní/k'òt'íní "man" ~ k'àt'únághá/k'òt'únághá
!      "men").
!
!      Many of these nouns can be analyzed as incorporating historical plural
!      suffixes with several forms, including:
!
!       i.   -íghá/ághá (e.g., xàkíjí "chief" ~ xàkújághá "chiefs");
!
!       ii.  -kúwá (e.g., ts'ootsa "old woman" ~ ts'ookúwá "old women",
!             alongside ts'ooká).
!
!       iii. -ká (in cases where the stem is shorter in the plural form than
!             in the singular, suggesting that this is not an instance of
!             regular suffixation of -ká as discussed above; e.g., isgiyá
!             "young man" ~ isgááká "young men", xàlítsa "old man" ~ xàlíká
!             "old men", ts'ootsa "old woman" ~ ts'ooká "old women").
!
!       For the purposes of FST modelling, all of these historical sub-classes
!       can be treated synchronically as involving the same kind of suppletive
!       relationship between singular and plural forms.
!
! There is also a separate post-nominal marker, yiná, that marks associative
! plurals referring to groups of human beings (e.g., Harold yiná "Harold and
! them", sídá yiná "my older sisters [as a group]").  It would be possible to
! analyze this as part of the nominal morphology surrounding nouns in
! Tsuut'ina, but, since yiná is often written as a separate word (or separated
! by a hyphen), we treat it here as an independent word form.
!
! The following lexc definitions use "+Sg" and "+Pl" tags to indicate the
! value of the number feature of nouns that distinguish singular and plural
! forms (both with the suffix -ká and by suppletion).  Nouns that do not
! distinguish singular and plural forms are not marked for this feature.
!
!
! The Big Crow and Big Plume dialect forms of the possessive prefixes defined
! below are widely attested in documentation of Tsuut'ina, and are drawn from
! several sources (e.g., inflected forms found in TLL-20220825).  Crowchief
! dialect possessive prefix forms are less well documented; the forms defined
! here are taken from Onespot & Young (1939: MSS 672 BC, Box 1, Folder 22a,
! p. 67; Edward Onespot, speaker), which provides a full list of prefix forms.
! Other attestations of Crowchief dialect possessive prefix forms may exist
! (e.g., in the grammatical elicitation sections of Goddard's unpublished
! Tsuut'ina fieldnotes, particularly in consultation with Annie Onespot, a
! Crowchief dialect speaker), and it may be valuable for those sources to be
! consulted further in future work.
LEXICON NounPrefixes
                                                   UnpossessedStems;
                                                   miPossessivePrefixes;
                                                   miHPossessivePrefixes;
                                                   miiHPossessivePrefixes;
                                                   maaPossessivePrefixes;

LEXICON miPossessivePrefixes

@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@si                            miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@ni                            miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@mi                            miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@yi                miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@di      miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@giyi              miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG4@:@U.PX.SG4@gu                            miPossessedStems;

@U.PX.PL1@                                         miPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL2@                                         miPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@gimi                          miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@gu                    miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@gidi        miPossessedStems;

@U.PX.AREAL@:@U.PX.AREAL@gu                        miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.GIVEN@:@U.PX.GIVEN@                          miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.INDEF@:@U.PX.INDEF@i                         miPossessedStems;
@U.PX.RECIP@                                       miPossessivePrefixesRecip;

LEXICON miPossessivePrefixes12PL
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@nihi        miPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@nahi      miPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@nahi    miPossessedStems;

LEXICON miPossessivePrefixesRecip
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ítłi        miPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@átłi      miPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ástłi     miPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@átłi    miPossessedStems;


LEXICON miHPossessivePrefixes

@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@sí                            miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@ní                            miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@mí                            miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@yí                miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@dí      miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@giyí              miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG4@:@U.PX.SG4@gú                            miHPossessedStems;

@U.PX.PL1@                                         miHPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL2@                                         miHPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@gimí                          miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@gú                    miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@gidí        miHPossessedStems;

@U.PX.AREAL@:@U.PX.AREAL@gú                        miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.GIVEN@:@U.PX.GIVEN@                          miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.INDEF@:@U.PX.INDEF@í                         miHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.RECIP@                                       miHPossessivePrefixesRecip;

LEXICON miHPossessivePrefixes12PL
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@nihí        miHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@nahí      miHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@nahí    miHPossessedStems;

LEXICON miHPossessivePrefixesRecip
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ítłí        miHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@átłí      miHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ástłí     miHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@átłí    miHPossessedStems;
